Illinois, session 104th, HB4623.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding 6Section 2705-628 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-628 new)8    Sec. 2705-628. Accommodation of firefighter vehicles. The 9Department shall work with the State Fire Marshal to develop 10best practices when constructing or reconstructing roadways to 11accommodate firefighter vehicles in turning and accessing 12roadways for emergencies, such as the inclusion of turnarounds 13on newly constructed or reconstructed roadways. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.